Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. RCW 82.16.0497 (CreditâLight and power business, gas distribution business) and 2020 c 139 s 26, 2006 c 213 s 1, & 2001 c 214 s 13 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---